Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4626
Visitation before termination of temporary grant of custodial responsibility.

After a deploying parent returns from deployment until a temporary agreement or order for custodial responsibility established under sections 43-4608 to 43-4612 or 43-4613 to 43-4623 is terminated, the court shall issue a temporary order granting the deploying parent reasonable contact with the child unless it is contrary to the best interest of the child, even if the time of contact exceeds the time the deploying parent spent with the child before deployment.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 26.